Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.390

Bicycle awareness program—Generally.

Bicycling is increasing in popularity as a form of recreation and as an alternative mode of transportation. To make bicycling safer, the various law enforcement agencies should enforce traffic regulations for bicyclists. By enforcing bicycle regulations, law enforcement officers are reinforcing educational programs. Bicycling takes more skill than most people realize. Since bicyclists have a low profile in traffic and are unprotected, they need more defensive riding skills than motorists do.

A bicycle awareness program is created within the Washington state patrol. In developing the curriculum for the bicycle awareness program the patrol shall consult with the traffic safety commission and with bicycling groups providing bicycle safety education. The patrol shall conduct the program in conjunction with the safety education officer program and may use other law enforcement personnel and volunteers to implement the program for children in grades kindergarten through six. The patrol shall ensure that each safety educator presenting the bicycle awareness program has received specialized training in bicycle safety education and has been trained in effective defensive bicycle riding skills.

[ 1991 c 214 s 1.]

NOTES:

Bicycle transportation management program: RCW 47.04.190.